North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-03.1 Highway Patrolmen’s Retirement System
39-03.1-14.2.
Benefit payments to alternate payee under qualified domestic relations order.

The board shall pay retirement benefits in accordance with the applicable requirements of any qualified domestic relations order. The board shall review a domestic relations order submitted to it to determine if the domestic relations order is qualified under this section and under rules established by the board for determining the qualified status of domestic relations orders and administering distributions under the qualified orders. Upon determination that a domestic relations order is qualified, the board shall notify the contributor and the named alternate payee of its receipt of the qualified domestic relations order.

A “qualified domestic relations order” for purposes of this section means any judgment, decree, or order, including approval of a property settlement agreement, which relates to the provision of child support, spousal support, or marital property rights to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a contributor, is made pursuant to a North Dakota domestic relations law, and which creates or recognizes the existence of an alternate payee’s right to, or assigns to an alternate payee the right to, receive all or a part of the benefits payable to the contributor. A qualified domestic relations order may not require the board to provide any type or form of benefit, or any option, not otherwise provided under the retirement system, or to provide increased benefits as determined on the basis of actuarial value. However, a qualified domestic relations order may require the payment of benefits at the early retirement date notwithstanding that the contributor has not terminated eligible employment. A qualified domestic relations order must specify:

The name and the last-known mailing address of the contributor and the name and mailing address of each alternate payee covered by the order;

The amount or percentage of the contributor’s benefits to be paid by the plan to each alternate payee;

The number of payments or period to which the order applies; and

Each retirement plan to which the order applies.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 392, § 3.

39-03.1-15.
Disability retirement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 380, § 8.

39-03.1-16.
Disability retirement allowance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 380, § 8.

39-03.1-17.
Severance allowance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 444, § 8.

39-03.1-18.
Compulsory termination of employment.

A contributor who is at least the age of sixty years may not continue employment with the patrol. The superintendent shall terminate the employment of such a member. The termination is effective no later than the member’s sixtieth birthday.

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 239, § 16; 1951, ch. 238, § 1; 1953, ch. 234, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-03A18; S.L. 1959, ch. 290, § 4; 1967, ch. 295, § 7; 1987, ch. 444, § 7.

39-03.1-19.
Refunds in case of resignation or discharge. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 269, § 9.

39-03.1-20.
Payments upon death. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 269, § 9.

39-03.1-21.
Payments in case of death. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 444, § 8.

39-03.1-21.1.
Children’s benefit — Limitation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 380, § 8.

39-03.1-22.
Payments of allowances.

The allowances granted under the provisions of this chapter may not be increased, decreased, revoked, or repealed except as provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 239, § 20; 1951, ch. 238, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-03A22.

39-03.1-23.
Exemptions from taxes and executions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 386, § 2.

39-03.1-24.
Service in the armed forces of the United States. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 377, § 2.

39-03.1-25.
Fraud — Correction of errors.

No person may knowingly make any false statement, or may falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of the retirement system herein established in any attempt to defraud such system. Should any such change in records fraudulently made or any mistake in records inadvertently made result in any contributor or other beneficiary receiving more or less than the person would have been entitled to had the records been correct, then, on the discovery of such error, the board shall correct such error and shall adjust the payments which shall be made to the contributor in such manner that the benefit to which the contributor was correctly entitled shall be paid.

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 239, § 24; 1951, ch. 238, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-03A25; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 421.

39-03.1-26.
Payments under other laws.

All payments provided for in this chapter are in addition to any other benefits now or hereafter provided for under the workforce safety and insurance laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 239, § 27; 1951, ch. 238, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-03A26; S.L. 1981, ch. 380, § 7; 1989, ch. 69, § 42; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

39-03.1-27.
Legislative intent.

The legislative assembly in recognition of the value of good employer-employee relationships and the need to recruit and retain qualified highway patrolmen in this state, hereby declares its intent that the state should provide the comparable contribution for retirement of highway patrolmen’s retirement system members as it provides for other state employees. It is the further intent of the legislative assembly that because of the increase in state contributions to the North Dakota highway patrolmen’s retirement system, the members of such system shall not obligate the state to additional payments for federal social security benefits for such members.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 353, § 1; 1989, ch. 447, § 2.

39-03.1-28.
Confidentiality of records.

All records relating to the retirement benefits of a member or a beneficiary under this chapter are confidential and are not public records. The information and records may be disclosed, under rules adopted by the board only to:

A person to whom the member has given written consent to have the information disclosed.

A person legally representing the member, upon proper proof of representation, and unless the member specifically withholds consent.

A person authorized by a court order.

A member’s participating employer, limited to information concerning the member’s years of service credit and years of age. The board may share other types of information as needed by the employer to validate the employer’s compliance with existing state or federal laws. Any information provided to the member’s participating employer under this subsection must remain confidential except as provided under subsection 6.

The administrative staff of the retirement and investment office for purposes relating to membership and benefits determination.

State or federal agencies for purposes of reporting on a service provider’s provision of services or when the employer must supply information to an agency to validate the employer’s compliance with existing state or federal laws.

Member interest groups approved by the board on a third-party blind list basis, limited to information concerning the member’s participation, name, and address.

The member’s spouse or former spouse, that individual’s legal representative, and the judge presiding over the member’s dissolution proceeding for purposes of aiding the parties in drafting a qualified domestic relations order under section 39-03.1-14.2. The information disclosed under this subsection must be limited to information necessary for drafting the order.

Beneficiaries designated by a participating member or a former participating member to receive benefits after the member’s death, but only after the member’s death. Information relating to beneficiaries may be disclosed to other beneficiaries of the same member.

Any person if the board determines disclosure is necessary for treatment, operational, or payment purposes, including the completion of necessary documents.

The general public, but only after the board has been unable to locate the member for a period in excess of two years, and limited to the member’s name and the fact that the board has been unable to locate the member.

A government child support enforcement agency for purposes of establishing paternity or establishing, modifying, or enforcing a child support obligation of the member.

A person if the information relates to an employer service purchase under section 39-03.1-10.2, but the information must be limited to the member’s name and employer, the retirement program in which the member participates, the amount of service credit purchased by the employer, and the total amount expended by the employer for that service credit purchase, and that information may only be obtained from the member’s employer.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 224, § 2; 2003, ch. 308, § 6; S.L. 2005, ch. 415, § 14; 2005, ch. 531, § 5; 2007, ch. 482, § 4.

39-03.1-29.
Savings clause — Plan modifications.

If the board determines that any section of this chapter does not comply with applicable federal statutes or rules, the board shall adopt appropriate terminology with respect to that section as will comply with those federal statutes or rules, subject to the approval of the employee benefits programs committee. Any plan modifications made by the board pursuant to this section are effective until the effective date of any measure enacted by the legislative assembly providing the necessary amendments to this chapter to ensure compliance with the federal statutes or rules.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 400, § 3; 2013, ch. 432, § 2.

39-03.1-30.
Conversion of sick leave.

A member is entitled to credit in the retirement system for each month of unused sick leave, as certified by the employer, if the member or the member’s employer pays an amount equal to the member’s final average salary, times the number of months of sick leave converted, times the employer and employee contribution, plus the required contribution for the retiree health benefits program. Hours of sick leave equal to a fraction of a month are deemed to be a full month for purposes of conversion to service credit. A member may convert all of the member’s certified sick leave or a part of that person’s certified sick leave.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 365, § 4; 1997, ch. 464, § 2; S.L. 2005, ch. 531, § 6; 2007, ch. 482, § 5.